src/numeral-smj-lex.txt
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA                  
+Num:e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTE- ;
+Num+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 K ;              
+Num+Sg+Gen:a%>Q1 NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;   
+Num:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTI- ;               
+Num: ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA- ;                 

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTE- 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;            
 +Sg+Gen: K ;   
 +Sg+Gen:%- K ;                         
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;   
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;             
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;             
 
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOVTI-   
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;            

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GUOKTA-            
 +Ess:a%>n K ;   
 +Ess:e%>n K ;             
                
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ           
+Num:%> GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ;      
+Num:%>Q1 GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;     
                        
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-NAIE      
 +Sg+Nom: K ;            
 +Sg+Acc: K ;            
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;           
 +Ess:n K ;              
                         
LEXICON GÅLMMÅ-OBL 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                  
 +Sg+Gen: K ;            
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;           
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;          
 +Sg+Par:t K ;           
 +Pl+Nom: K ;            
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;           
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;          
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;         
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;          
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;          
 +Pl+Com:j K ;           

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ           
+Num:%> ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-NAIE ;      
+Num:%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;     
                        
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-NAIE      
 +Sg+Ill:j K ;           
 +Ess:n K ;              
                         
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÅLMMÅ-OBL 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                  
 +Sg+Gen: K ;            
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;           
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;           
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;          
 +Sg+Par:t K ;           


LEXICON GIETJAV             
+Num:%> GIETJAV-IE ;          
+Num:%>Q1 GIETJAV-OBL ;       
                            
LEXICON GIETJAV-IE  
 +Ill:j K ;        
 +Ess:n K ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;                 
                        
LEXICON GIETJAV-OBL         
 +Sg+Nom:v K ;
 +Sg+Nom: K ;                            
 +Sg+Gen: K ;               
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;              
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;              
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;              
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;              
 +Pl+Nom: K ;               
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;              
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;             
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;            
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;             
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;             
 +Pl+Com:j K ;              
 
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV             
+Num:%> ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-IE ;          
+Num:%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-OBL ;       
                            
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-IE  
 +Ill:j K ;        
 +Ess:n K ;
                        
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GIETJAV-OBL         
 +Sg+Nom:v K ;
 +Sg+Gen: K ;               
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;              
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;              
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;              
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;              

LEXICON GÁKTSA              
+Num:e%>Q1 GÁVTSE- ;           
+Num:i%>Q1 GÁVTSI- ;           
+Num: GÁKTSA- ;             
                            
LEXICON GÁVTSE-   
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                       
 +Sg+Gen: K ;              
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;             
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;             
 +Pl+Nom: K ;              

LEXICON GÁVTSI-        
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;            
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;             
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;            
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;           
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;            
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;            
 +Pl+Com:j K ;             
                            
                            
LEXICON GÁKTSA-             
 +Sg+Nom:%>a K ;   
 +Sg+Nom:%>e K ;                         
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;              
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;             
 +Ess:a%>n K ;   
 +Ess:e%>n K ;      
   
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA              
+Num:e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSE- ;           
+Num:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSI- ;           
+Num: ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA- ;             
                            
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSE-   
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                       
 +Sg+Gen: K ;              
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;             
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;             
 +Sg+Par:t K ;             

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁVTSI-        
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;            
                            
                            
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-GÁKTSA-             
 +Sg+Nom:%>a K ;   
 +Sg+Nom:%>e K ;                         
 +Sg+Acc:%>a K ;              
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;             
 +Ess:a%>n K ;   
 +Ess:e%>n K ;      


LEXICON AKTSE            
+Num:e%>Q1 AVTSE- ;           
+Num:i%>Q1 AVTSI- ;           
+Num: AKTS- ;             

LEXICON AVTSE- 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                    
 +Sg+Gen: K ;          
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;         
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;         
 +Sg+Par:t K ;         
 +Pl+Nom: K ;          

LEXICON AVTSI-         
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;        
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;         
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;        
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;       
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;        
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;        
 +Pl+Com:j K ;         
                        
                    
LEXICON AKTS-           
 +Sg+Nom:e%> K ;          
 +Sg+Acc:e%> K ;          
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;         
 +Ess:e%>n K ;        
 
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTSE            
+Num:e%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AVTSE- ;           
+Num:i%>Q1 ẈG-LÅK-AVTSI- ;           
+Num: ẈG-LÅK-AKTS- ;             

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AVTSE- 
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;                    
 +Sg+Gen: K ;          
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;         
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;         
 +Sg+Par:t K ;         
 +Pl+Nom: K ;          

LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AVTSI-         
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;        
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;         
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;        
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;       
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;        
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;        
 +Pl+Com:j K ;         
                        
                    
LEXICON ẈG-LÅK-AKTS-           
 +Sg+Nom:e%> K ;          
 +Sg+Acc:e%> K ;          
 +Sg+Ill:á%>j K ;         
 +Ess:e%>n K ;        

LEXICON LÅGEV                
+Num:e%>Q1 LÅGE- ;    
+Num:i%>Q1 LÅGI- ;    
+Num: LÅHK- ;     
                   
LEXICON LÅGE-      
 +Sg+Nom:v K ;    
 +Sg+Acc:v K ;    
 +Sg+Gen: K ;     
 +Sg+Gen: NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Ine:n K ;    
 +Sg+Ela:s K ;    
 +Sg+Par:t K ;    
 +Pl+Nom: K ;     

LEXICON LÅGI-      
 +Sg+Com:jn K ;   
 +Pl+Gen:j K ;    
 +Pl+Acc:jt K ;   
 +Pl+Ill:jda K ;  
 +Pl+Ine:jn K ;   
 +Pl+Ela:js K ;   
 +Pl+Com:j K ;    
                   
                   
LEXICON LÅHK-      
 +Sg+Ill:å%>j K ;    
 +Ess:e%>n K ;       
                   
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN  
+Num:%> AKTALÅGENAN-NIE ;  
+Num:%>Q1 AKTALÅGENAN-OBL ;      
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-NIE    
 +Sg+Nom:#lågenan%> K ;     
 +Sg+Ill:j#lågenan%> K ;       
 +Ess:n#lågenan%> K ;        
                   
LEXICON AKTALÅGENAN-OBL    
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%> K ;      
 +Sg+Gen:#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
 +Sg+Acc:v#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ine:n#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Ela:s#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Com:jn#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Sg+Par:t#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Nom:#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Gen:j#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Acc:jt#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Ill:jda#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Ine:jn#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Ela:js#lågenan%> K ; 
 +Pl+Com:j#lågenan%> K ; 
 
LEXICON ÅVTÅLÅGENAN                   
+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#lågenan%> K ;              
+Num+Sg+Gen:%>#lågenan%> NUMERALCOMPOUNDS ;
+Num+Sg+Acc:%>v#lågenan%> K ;             
+Num+Sg+Ine:%>n#lågenan%> K ;             
+Num+Sg+Ela:%>s#lågenan%> K ;             
+Num+Sg+Com:%>jn#lågenan%> K ;            
+Num+Sg+Par:%>t#lågenan%> K ;             
+Num+Pl+Nom:%>#lågenan%> K ;              
+Num+Pl+Gen:%>j#lågenan%> K ;             
+Num+Pl+Acc:%>jt#lågenan%> K ;            
+Num+Pl+Ill:%>jda#lågenan%> K ;           
+Num+Pl+Ine:%>jn#lågenan%> K ;            
+Num+Pl+Ela:%>js#lågenan%> K ;            
+Num+Pl+Com:%>j#lågenan%> K ;             
                                      

LEXICON LÅGENAN					
lågenan#gålmmå GÅLMMÅ ;       
lågenan#vihtta+Num:lågenan#vidá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;             
lågenan#guhtta+Num:lågenan#gudá GÅLMMÅ-OBL ;          
lågenan#gietjav:lågenan#giehtja GIETJAV ;        
lågenan#gáktsa:lågenan#gákts GÁKTSA ;       
lågenan#aktse:lågenan#akts AKTSE ;                 
akta#lågenan:akta AKTALÅGENAN ;        
akta#lågenan:åvtå ÅVTÅLÅGENAN ;		
